Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.170

Unlicensed activity—Criminal penalties.

(1) Any person who performs the functions and duties of a bail bond agent in this state without being licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or any person presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the license of another, or any person who gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the director in obtaining a license, or any person who falsely impersonates any other licensee, or any person who attempts to use an expired or revoked license, or any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person owns or operates a bail bond agency in this state without first obtaining a bail bond agency license.

(3) The owner or qualified agent of a bail bond agency is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the owner or qualified agent employs any person to perform the duties of a bail bond agent without the employee having in the employee's possession a permanent bail bond agent license issued by the department.

(4) After December 31, 2005, a person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person:

(a) Performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without first obtaining a license from the department and entering into a contract with a bail bond agent as required by this chapter; or, in the case of a bail bond recovery agent from another state, the person performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without operating under the direct supervision of a licensed bail bond recovery agent as required by this chapter; or

(b) Conducts a planned forced entry without first complying with the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2004 c 186 s 13; 2002 c 86 s 254; 1993 c 260 s 18.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.